apertium-kgp.kgp.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for kgp

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>                              ! Noun
%<ij%>                             ! Interjection
%<conj%>                           ! Conjunction
%<v%>                              ! Verb
%<prn%>                            ! Pronoun

! Markers
%<a%>                              ! Aspect marker
%<cir%>                            ! Circumstance marker
%<mod%>                            ! Modality marker
%<o%>                              ! Opinion marker
%<su%>                             ! Subject marker
%<want%>                           ! Want to marker ('sór')
%<hab%>                            ! Habitual (verb marker)
%<sit%>                            ! Situational (verb marker)
%<fut%>                            ! Future marker

! Number and gender morphology
%<pl%>                             ! Plural
%<sg%>                             ! Singular
%<nf%>                             ! Non-feminine
%<f%>                              ! Feminine

! Verb types and forms
%<tv%>                             ! Transitive
%<iv%>                             ! Intransitive
%<sv%>                             ! Semi-transitive

! Pronoun Types
%<dem%>                            ! Demonstrative
%<prx%>                            ! Proximal
%<dst%>                            ! Distal
%<pes%>                            ! Personal
%<ref%>                            ! Reflexive
%<rel%>                            ! Relational
%<ind%>                            ! Indefinite
%<p1%>                             ! 1st person
%<p2%>                             ! 2nd person
%<p3%>                             ! 3rd person

! Noun Types
%<nom%>                            ! Nominative
%<agent%>                          ! Agent
%<acc%>                            ! Accusative

! Punctuation stuff
%<sent%>                           ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>                           ! Hyphen
%<cm%>                             ! Comma
%<apos%>                           ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>                          ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>                          ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>                           ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>                           ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

! Other symbols
%>                                 ! Morpheme boundary
%{n%}
%{h%}
%+

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;
Verbs ;
TransitiveVerbs ;
IntransitiveVerbs ;
SemiTransitiveVerbs ;
Pronouns ;
Conjunctions ;
CircumstanceMarkers ;
SubjectMarkers ;
ModalityMarkers ;
AspectMarkers ;
OpinionMarkers ;
Interjections ;
Digits ;
Punctuation ;
Temporary ;
nh%<fut%>:nh # ;
sór%<want%>:sór # ;
tỹ%<top%>:tỹ # ;
tỹ%<erg%>:tỹ # ;
tỹ%<ex%>:tỹ # ;

LEXICON GenderAndNumberTag
%<nf%>%<sg%>:%>% ti # ;
%<f%>%<sg%>:%>% fi # ;
%<nf%>%<pl%>:%>% ag # ;
%<f%>%<pl%>:%>% fag # ;

LEXICON Habitual
%<hab%>:%>gtĩ # ; ! Dir/LR
%<hab%>:%>% tĩ # ;

LEXICON Situational
%<sit%>:%>% nĩ # ;

LEXICON SingularOrPlural
%<sg%>:%>% tĩ # ;
%<pl%>:%>% mũ # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Verbs
fãn%<v%>%<iv%>:fãn # ;
fãn%<v%>%<iv%>:fã # ; ! v1
fãn%<v%>%<iv%>:fa # ; ! v2
fãn%<v%>%<iv%>:fãg # ; ! v3

kanhró%<v%>%<iv%>:kanhró # ;
kanhró%<v%>%<iv%>:kanhrã # ; ! v1

ẽkrénh%<v%>%<iv%>:ẽkrénh # ; ! ẽkré~nh
ẽkrénh%<v%>%<iv%>+:ẽkrénh%  # ;
!ẽkrénh%<v%>%<iv%>+:ẽkré%{n%}%{h%}%  # ; ! Dir/LR

te%<v%>%<iv%>:te #;
te%<v%>%<iv%>:te SingularOrPlural ;

rĩnh%<v%>%<tv%>:rĩ # ; ! v1
rĩnh%<v%>%<tv%>:rĩnh # ; ! v2
rĩnh%<v%>%<tv%>:rĩg  # ; ! v3

rĩnh%<v%>%<tv%>:rĩnh SingularOrPlural ; ! rĩ~nh
rĩnh%<v%>%<tv%>+:rĩnh%  # ;
!rĩnh%<v%>%<tv%>+:rĩ%{n%}%{h%}%  # ; ! Dir/LR

he%<v%>%<tv%>:he # ;
he%<v%>%<tv%>:hé # ; ! v1

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Pronouns
!inh%<prn%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:inh # ;   ! i~nh
!inh%<prn%>%<p1%>%<sg%>+:i%{n%}%{h%}%  Nouns ; ! Dir/LR

! Personal Pronouns
inh%<prn%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:inh # ; ! eu
ẽ%<prn%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:ẽ # ; ! você
ã%<prn%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:ã # ; ! você
ãjag%<prn%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ãjag # ; ! vocês
ti%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nf%>%<sg%>:ti # ; ! ele
ag%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nf%>%<pl%>:ag # ; ! eles
fi%<prn%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:fi # ; ! ela
fag%<prn%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<pl%>:fag # ; ! elas
ẽg%<prn%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:ẽg # ; ! nós

! Distal and Proximal Pronouns
tag%<prn%>%<dem%>%<prx%>:tag # ; ! esse
tã%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dst%>:tã # ; ! aquele/lá
ẽn%<prn%>%<dem%>:ẽn # ; ! aquilo

jagnẽ%<prn%>%<ref%>:jagnẽ # ;
vẽnh%<prn%>%<ref%>:vẽnh # ;
ũ%<prn%>%<ind%>:ũ # ; ! alguém/um
ũn%<prn%>%<rel%>:ũn # ; ! aquele

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Conjunctions
ge% ra%<conj%>:ge% ra # ;
hã% jé%<conj%>:hã% jé # ;
hã% kato%<conj%>:hã% kato # ;
hã% kỹ%<conj%>:hã% kỹ # ;
hã% ra%<conj%>:hã% ra # ;
hã% ri%<conj%>:hã% ri # ;
hã% to%<conj%>:hã% to # ;
hã% tugrĩn%<conj%>:hã% tugrĩn # ;
hã% tỹ%<conj%>:hã% tỹ  # ;
jarĩnmỹ%<conj%>:jarĩnmỹ # ;
jãvo%<conj%>:jãvo # ;
jo%<conj%>:jo # ;
kỹ%<conj%>:kỹ # ;
mũ% ra%<conj%>:mũ% ra # ;
mỹr’%<conj%>:mỹr’ # ;

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON SubjectMarkers
jé%<su%>: jé # ;
ne%<su%>:ne # ;
né%<su%>:né # ;
nỹ%<su%>:nỹ # ;
pi%<su%>:pi # ; ! negates "does not do this thing"
pijé%<su%>:pijé # ;
sóg%<su%>:sóg # ; ! Only in first-person singular VVV
tóg%<su%>:tóg # ;
vé%<su%>:vé # ;
vỹ%<su%>:vỹ # ;
mỹ%<su%>:mỹ # ;

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON ModalityMarkers
e%<mod%>:e # ;
ge%<mod%>:ge # ;
gé%<mod%>:gé # ;
gy%<mod%>:gy # ;
ha%<mod%>:ha # ;
hẽ%<mod%>:hẽ # ;
hẽ’%<mod%>:hẽ’ # ;
hỹn%<mod%>:hỹn # ;
ja%<mod%>:ja # ;
kamẽ%<mod%>:kamẽ # ;
kógnár%<mod%>: kógnár # ;
ker%<mod%>:ker # ;
kur%<mod%>:kur # ;
kusũg%<mod%>: kusũg # ;
kónãn%<mod%>:kónãn # ;
kren%<mod%>:kren # ;
mãn%<mod%>:mãn # ;
mé%<mod%>:mé # ;
mẽ%<mod%>:mẽ # ;
mrãj%<mod%>:mrãj # ;
mré% ke%<mod%>:mré% ke # ;
pẽ%<mod%>:pẽ # ;
pijé’%<mod%>:pijé’ # ;
rén%<mod%>:rén # ;
sá%<mod%>: sá # ;
sór%<mod%>:sór # ;
tánh%<mod%>: tánh # ;
tãvĩ%<mod%>:tãvĩ # ;
tũ%<mod%>:tũ # ;
vãnh%<mod%>:vãnh # ; ! vã~nh
vãnh%<mod%>+:vãnh%  # ;
vãnh%<mod%>+:vã%{n%}%{h%}%  # ; ! Dir/LR
jãvãnh%<mod%>:jãvãnh # ; ! jãvã~nh
jãvãnh%<mod%>+:jãvãnh%  # ;
jãvãnh%<mod%>+:jãvã%{n%}%{h%}%  # ; ! Dir/LR
tãvĩn%<mod%>:tãvĩn # ; ! fix
vén%<mod%>:vén # ; ! fix
ve%<mod%>:ve # ; ! fix

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON AspectMarkers
jẽ%<a%>:jẽ # ;
jẽ% nĩ%<a%>:jẽ% nĩ # ;
jẽ% vẽ%<a%>:jẽ% vẽ # ;
jẽgtĩ%<a%>:jẽgtĩ # ;
mũ%<a%>:mũ # ;
mũ% nĩ%<a%>:mũ% nĩ # ;
mũ% vẽ%<a%>:mũ% vẽ # ;
mũgtĩ%<a%>:mũgtĩ # ;
nĩ% nĩ%<a%>:nĩ% nĩ # ;
nĩ% vẽ%<a%>:nĩ% vẽ # ;
nĩgtĩ%<a%>:nĩgtĩ # ;
nỹ%<a%>:nỹ # ;
nỹ% nĩ%<a%>:nỹ% nĩ # ;
nỹ% vẽ%<a%>:nỹ% vẽ # ;
nỹgtĩ%<a%>:nỹgtĩ # ;
nỹtĩ% nĩ%<a%>:nỹtĩ% nĩ # ;
nỹtĩ% vẽ%<a%>:nỹtĩ% vẽ # ;
nỹtĩgtĩ%<a%>:nỹtĩgtĩ # ;
rã% nĩ%<a%>:rã% nĩ # ;
sa%<a%>:sa # ;
sa% nĩ%<a%>:sa% nĩ # ;
sa% vẽ%<a%>:sa% vẽ # ;
sagtĩ%<a%>:sagtĩ # ;
tĩ%<a%>:tĩ # ;
tĩ% nĩ%<a%>:tĩ% nĩ # ;
tĩ% vẽ%<a%>:tĩ% vẽ # ;
tĩgtĩ%<a%>:tĩgtĩ # ;
vẽ%<a%>:vẽ # ;
vẽ% vẽ%<a%>:vẽ% vẽ # ;
vẽgtĩ%<a%>:vẽgtĩ # ;
nĩ%<a%>:nĩ # ;

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON OpinionMarkers
hã%<o%>:hã # ;
hur%<o%>:hur # ;
huri%<o%>:huri # ;
hỹn%<o%>:hỹn # ;
inhhã%<o%>:inhhã # ;
ker%<o%>:ker # ;
sir%<o%>: sir # ;
mari%<o%>:mari # ;
mỹr%<o%>:mỹr # ;
nẽji%<o%>:nẽji # ;
kur%<o%>:kur # ;

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------
